apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="access__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bab/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="analys/is__n">
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="maxim/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mon/ey__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ey</l>        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eys</l>       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ies</l>       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/an__n">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bass__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bus__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ses</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="politics__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
 <!-- TODO: meti r="RL" kaj retejnu la tagger -->
  <e><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="wol/f__n">
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fs</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="li/fe__n">
  <e>       <p><l>fe</l>        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ves</l>       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="staff__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="child__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ouse__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ouse</l>      <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ice</l>       <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ouses</l>     <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/oot__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oot</l>       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oots</l>      <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eets</l>      <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/other__n">
  <e>       <p><l>other</l>     <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ethren</l>    <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>others</l>    <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stimul/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="larva__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ind/ex__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ex</l>        <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>exes</l>      <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ices</l>      <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="appendi/x__n">
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>xes</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="criteri/on__n">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="schema__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tableau__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ooth__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ooth</l>      <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeth</l>      <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/oose__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oose</l>      <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eese</l>      <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="librett/o__n">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lir/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pen/ny__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ny</l>        <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nies</l>      <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="corp/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ora</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uses</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="archipelago__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cact/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uses</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bonus">           <i>bonus</i><par n="bass__n"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="box">             <i>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="brother">         <i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
<e lm="bureau">          <i>bureau</i><par n="tableau__n"/></e>
<e lm="bus">             <i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="child">           <i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
<e lm="circumflex">      <i>circumfl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="complex">         <i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="concerto">        <i>concert</i><par n="librett/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="corpus">          <i>corp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="epididymis">      <i>epididym</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="foot">            <i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
<e lm="fish">            <i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="focus">           <i>foc</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="fresco">          <i>fresco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="goose">           <i>g</i><par n="g/oose__n"/></e>
<e lm="galaxy">          <i>galax</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="genius">          <i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="grandchild">      <i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
<e lm="half">            <i>hal</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="insignia">        <i>insignia</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="knife">           <i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="leaf">            <i>lea</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="life">            <i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="lira">            <i>lir</i><par n="lir/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="mouse">           <i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
<e lm="money">           <i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
<e lm="nucleus">         <i>nucle</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="oasis">           <i>oas</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="penny">           <i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/></e>
<e lm="placebo">         <i>placebo</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="plateau">         <i>plateau</i><par n="tableau__n"/></e>
<e lm="pyrotechnics">    <i>pyrotechnics</i><par n="politics__n"/><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
<e lm="redundancy">      <i>redundanc</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="retina">          <i>retina</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="retrovirus">      <i>retrovir</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="schoolchild">     <i>schoolchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
<e lm="scratch">         <i>scratch</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="staff">           <i>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="stigma">          <i>stigma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="stimulus">        <i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="tooth">           <i>t</i><par n="t/ooth__n"/></e>
<e lm="talisman">        <i>talism</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="tennis">          <i>tenn</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="trauma">          <i>trauma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="tuna">            <i>tuna</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="vulva">           <i>vulva</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="wife">            <i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="wolf">            <i>wol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="checkers">       <i>checkers</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="corrigendum">       <i>corrigend</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="disposition">       <i>dispositi</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="empyrean">       <i>empyre</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="helix">       <i>heli</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="newness">       <i>newness</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="oblation">       <i>oblati</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraphrasis">       <i>paraphrasis</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="planetarium">       <i>planetari</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="postbox">       <i>postbo</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="radiography">       <i>radiograph</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="sputum">       <i>sput</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="superman">       <i>superm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="valuelessness">       <i>valuelessness</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
